Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB709.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 85MOTOR CARRIER PARKING SPACE TAX CREDITSec.8501. Definitions.8502. Eligibility.8503. Procedure.8504. Motor carrier parking space tax credit.8505. Carryover and limitations.8506. Sale or assignment.8507. Pass-through entity.8508. Penalties.123456789101112131415161718 8509. Standards and procedures.8510. Surplus real property study.8511. Construction.§ 8501. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Motor carrier parking space." A designated area that:(1) is clearly marked;(2) is 10 feet wide by 80 feet long;(3) has the purpose of fitting a motor carrier vehicle accompanied by a semitrailer inside its parameters; and(4) provides sufficient spacing to give adequate capacity for a motor carrier vehicle's turning radius."Pass-through entity." Any of the following:(1) A partnership as defined in section 301(n.0) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(2) A Pennsylvania S corporation as defined in section 301(n.1) of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(3) An unincorporated entity subject to section 307.21 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Qualified tax liability." A taxpayer's tax liability under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX, XI or XV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Semitrailer." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Start date." The first day of the calendar quarter in which an application is submitted to the department unless the 20250HB0709PN0728 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicant requests and the department agrees to a later start date."Surplus real property." A plot of land owned by the Commonwealth or the Department of General Services on behalf of the Commonwealth."Tax credit." The motor carrier parking space tax credit authorized by this chapter."Taxpayer." A person that satisfies the eligibility qualifications as prescribed in section 8502 (relating to eligibility)."Tier 1 corridor." Any of the following:(1) I-76 from US-1 to I-95 in Philadelphia, Philadelphia County.(2) I-78 from Exit 49 (PA-100) to the State line.(3) I-79 from the Ohio River to Exit 76 (Pennsylvania Turnpike).(4) I-81 from Exit 44 to the Susquehanna River.(5) I-81 from I-83 to I-78.(6) I-83 from US-322 to I-81.(7) I-95 in the Philadelphia area from the State line to I-276.(8) The Pennsylvania Turnpike (I-76) from Exit 57 (US 22) to Exit 75 (I-70).(9) The Pennsylvania Turnpike (I-76) from Exit 298 (I-176) to Norristown (I-476).(10) The Pennsylvania Turnpike (I-276) from Valley Forge (I-76) to I-95."Tier 2 corridor." Any of the following:(1) I-70 between I-79 and the Pennsylvania Turnpike (I-76).20250HB0709PN0728 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) I-76 from the Pennsylvania Turnpike (Valley Forge Interchange) to Exit 340 (US 1).(3) I-78 from I-81 to Exit 49 (PA 100).(4) I-79 from Exit 49 (PA 576) to the Ohio River.(5) I-80 from PA SR 38 to PA SR 66. (6) I-80 from PA SR 42 to I-81. (7) I-81 from the Pennsylvania-Maryland State line to Exit 52 (Pennsylvania Turnpike).(8) I-81 from the Susquehanna River to I-83.(9) I-81 from Exit 164 (Sugar Notch) to Exit 194 (I-476).(10) I-83 from Exit 21 (US 30) to US 322 in Dauphin County.(11) I-84 from I-81 (Dunmore) to I-380.(12) I-376 from Exit 64 (I-79) to Exit 80 (US 22).(13) I-476 from I-76 (Conshohocken) to I-276 (Norristown).(14) The Pennsylvania Turnpike (I-76) from Exit 13 (Homewood) to Exit 57 (US 22/Pittsburgh).(15) The Pennsylvania Turnpike (I-70/I-76) from Exit 75 (New Stanton) to Somerset North/South Service Plazas.(16) The Pennsylvania Turnpike Northeast Extension (I-476) from I-276 (Norristown) to I-78 (Lehigh Valley)."Year one." The four calendar quarters immediately following the start date.§ 8502. Eligibility.In order to apply for a tax credit, a person must demonstrate to the department the following:(1) The ability of the person to create five new free-of-charge and publicly available motor carrier parking spaces 20250HB0709PN0728 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on property leased or owned by the taxpayer.(2) The motor carrier parking spaces must be made with concrete or asphalt.(3) The property must be at least three acres in size.(4) The property must not be more than one mile from either a Tier 1 corridor or Tier 2 corridor.(5) The property must be zoned as commercial or industrial.(6) The property must have adequate lighting.(7) The property must have either a mobile or permanent bathroom facility for use by the public.(8) The person must have the intent to maintain existing operations in this Commonwealth for a period of at least five years from the start date.§ 8503. Procedure.(a) Application.--A taxpayer may apply for a claim to receive a tax credit by submitting to the department a tax credit application on a form and in a manner as determined by the department.(b) Creation of motor carrier parking spaces.--In order to receive a tax credit, the taxpayer must agree to:(1) create in year one at least five motor carrier parking spaces on the property; and(2) retain the motor carrier parking spaces for as long as the taxpayer continues to operate while receiving the tax credit.(c) Approval.--If the department approves the taxpayer's application, the department and the taxpayer must enter into an agreement containing the following:(1) A description and the number of the motor carrier 20250HB0709PN0728 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parking spaces to be created by the taxpayer.(2) The amount of private capital investment in the creation of motor carrier parking spaces.(3) The maximum tax credit amount that the taxpayer may claim.(4) An obligation of the taxpayer to maintain existing operations in this Commonwealth for at least five years from the start date.(5) Any other information the department deems appropriate.(d) Agreement.--(1) After an agreement is executed between the department and a taxpayer, the taxpayer shall create the motor carrier parking spaces on the property in year one in accordance with section 8502 (relating to eligibility) and the terms of the agreement.(2) If the taxpayer does not create the motor carrier parking spaces in accordance with section 8502 and the agreement, the taxpayer shall be in breach of the agreement and the department shall terminate the agreement.§ 8504. Motor carrier parking space tax credit.(a) Maximum amount.--The department may award a tax credit of $5,000 per newly created motor carrier parking space not to exceed a total tax credit of up to $100,000 per taxpayer.(b) Certificate.--(1) After the agreement between the department and a taxpayer is executed under section 8503 (relating to procedure), the department shall determine in year one whether the taxpayer has created the motor carrier parking spaces and is otherwise in compliance with the agreement.20250HB0709PN0728 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) If the department is satisfied that the motor carrier parking spaces have been created and that the taxpayer is in compliance with the agreement, the department shall issue a tax credit certificate and filing information to the taxpayer.(3) If the department is not satisfied that the motor carrier parking spaces have been created and that the taxpayer is in compliance with the agreement, the department may not issue a tax credit certificate and filing information to the taxpayer. Subject to the limitations in subsection (c), the department shall issue tax credits on a first-come, first-served basis.(c) Limitation.--For the fiscal year starting on June 30, 2025, the department shall issue no more than $10,000,000 in tax credits. Starting on June 30, 2026, and ending on June 30, 2035, the department shall authorize an additional $1,000,000 in tax credits in excess of the limit on the tax credits authorized for the prior fiscal year. Beginning June 30, 2035, the department will be limited to awarding $20,000,000 for each fiscal year. In any fiscal year, the department may reissue, assign or award prior fiscal year tax credits which have been recaptured under section 8508 (relating to penalties) and award prior fiscal year tax credits not previously issued.(d) Duration of tax credit.--A taxpayer may claim the tax credit for the year in which the tax credit was approved and may continue to receive the tax credit until the taxpayer is no longer operating, as long as the taxpayer maintains the motor carrier parking spaces.(e) Subject to tax credit and tax benefit administration.--The tax credit shall be subject to Article XVII-A.1 of the act 20250HB0709PN0728 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.§ 8505. Carryover and limitations.The following limitations apply to tax credits:(1) If a taxpayer cannot use the entire amount of the tax credit for the taxable year in which the tax credit is first approved, the excess may be carried over to succeeding taxable years and used as a tax credit against the qualified tax liability of the taxpayer for the taxable years. Each time the tax credit is carried over to a succeeding taxable year, the tax credit shall be reduced by the amount of the tax credit used as a tax credit during the immediately preceding taxable year. The tax credit may be carried over and applied to succeeding taxable years for no more than three taxable years following the first taxable year for which the taxpayer was entitled to claim the tax credit.(2) A tax credit for a taxable year first shall be applied against the taxpayer's qualified tax liability for the current taxable year as of the date on which the tax credit was approved before the tax credit may be applied against any tax liability under paragraph (1).(3) A taxpayer is not entitled to carry back or obtain a refund of all or any portion of an unused tax credit granted to the taxpayer.§ 8506. Sale or assignment.(a) Application.--(1) A taxpayer, upon application to and approval by the department, may sell or assign, in whole or in part, a tax credit granted to the taxpayer.(2) The department shall issue guidelines for the 20250HB0709PN0728 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approval of applications for tax credits.(3) Before the department may approve an application, the department must determine whether the applicant has filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years and paid any balance of State tax due as determined at settlement, assessment or determination by the department.(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department must settle, assess or determine the tax of an applicant under this paragraph within 90 days of the filing of each required final return or report in accordance with section 806.1(a)(5) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.(b) Use by purchaser or assignee.--(1) The purchaser or assignee of all or a portion of a tax credit under subsection (a) must immediately claim the tax credit in the taxable year in which the purchase or assignment is made.(2) The amount of the tax credit that a purchaser or assignee may use against any one qualified tax liability may not exceed 50% of the qualified tax liability for the taxable year.(3) The purchaser or assignee may not carry forward, carry back or obtain a refund of or sell or assign the tax credit.(4) The purchaser or assignee shall notify the department of the seller or assignor of the tax credit in compliance with procedures specified by the department.§ 8507. Pass-through entity.(a) General rule.--If a pass-through entity has any unused 20250HB0709PN0728 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 tax credits under section 8505 (relating to carryover and limitations), the entity may elect in writing, according to procedures established by the department, to transfer all or a portion of the tax credit to shareholders, members or partners in proportion or the share of the entity's distributive income to which the shareholder, member or partner is entitled.(b) Limitation.--A pass-through entity and a shareholder, member or partner of a pass-through entity may not claim the tax credit under subsection (a) for the same motor carrier parking spaces.(c) Application.--A shareholder, member or partner of a pass-through entity to whom a tax credit is transferred under subsection (a) shall immediately claim the tax credit in the taxable year in which the transfer is made. The shareholder, member or partner may not carry forward, carry back, obtain a refund of or sell or assign the tax credit.§ 8508. Penalties.(a) Failure to maintain operations.--A taxpayer that receives a tax credit and fails to maintain existing operations related to the tax credits in this Commonwealth for as long as the taxpayer continues to operate while receiving the tax credit shall refund to the Commonwealth the total amount of tax credits granted. The department may issue an assessment, including interest, additions and penalties, for the total amount of each tax credit to be refunded to the Commonwealth.(b) Failure to maintain motor carrier parking.--A taxpayer that receives a tax credit and fails to maintain the motor carrier parking spaces for as long as the taxpayer continues to operate while receiving the tax credit must refund to the Commonwealth the total amount of tax credits granted. The 20250HB0709PN0728 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department may issue an assessment, including interest, additions and penalties, for the total amount of tax credits to be refunded to the Commonwealth.(c) Waiver.--The department may waive the penalties under subsections (a) and (b) if the department determines that the taxpayer's existing operations were not maintained or the motor carrier parking spaces were not created because of circumstances beyond the taxpayer's control, including a natural disaster, unforeseen industry trend or a loss of a major supplier or market.§ 8509. Standards and procedures.The department shall establish standards and procedures for the tax credit.§ 8510. Surplus real property study.(a) Duty of Department of General Services.--The Department of General Services shall conduct a study of surplus real property described in subsection (b) for the purpose of analyzing if the property could be sold to a private entity for the purpose of creating motor carrier parking spaces. In carrying out the study, the Department of General Services may enter into an agreement with or consult with the following organizations:(1) The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth.(2) The Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission.(3) A State association that represents the motor trucking industry.(4) Other organizations deemed necessary by the Department of General Services.(b) Parameters.--In conducting the study, the Department of 20250HB0709PN0728 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 General Services shall analyze surplus real property that:(1) is within one mile of a Tier 1 corridor or Tier 2 corridor;(2) is at least three acres in size; and(3) is zoned for commercial or industrial use.(c) Condition.--The study shall describe how the surplus real property could be developed for motor carrier parking spaces utilizing Federal grants.(d) Agreement.--The Department of General Services and the organizations listed in subsection (a) may enter into an agreement to conduct the study and issue the report under subsection (e).(e) Report.--Within 12 months of the effective date of this subsection, the Department of General Services shall publish a report of the study on its publicly accessible Internet website and issue a copy of the report to each of the following:(1) The Secretary of Transportation of the Commonwealth.(2) The Pennsylvania Transportation Advisory Committee.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the Senate.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives.§ 8511. Construction.Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or disallow a motor carrier vehicle from parking in a designated motor carrier parking space on a taxpayer's property.20250HB0709PN0728 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) This section and the addition of 74 Pa.C.S. § 8510 shall take effect immediately.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect December 31, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB0709PN0728 - 13 - 12345